Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.72.300.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the Board of Examiners in Optometry;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“opioid” includes the opium and opiate substances and opium and opiate derivatives listed in AS

11.71.140

and

11.71.160

;

“optometry” means the examination, evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, or performance of preventive procedures related to diseases, disorders, or conditions of the human eyes or adjacent and associated structures, consistent with this chapter and regulations adopted by the board;

“practicing optometry” means the performance of, or offer to perform, optometry for compensation;

“recognized school or college of optometry” means a school or college approved by the American Optometric Association or a committee of the American Optometric Association.

History.

(§ 35-3-131 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 95 SLA 1966; am § 13 ch 76 SLA 1969; am § 53 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 21, 22 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 49 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 17 SLA 2017; am § 28 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 and 2019 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For professional designation requirements for optometrists, see AS

08.02.010

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 24, 2017, rewrote (3).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, added (6) [now (3)].

Sec. 08.72.310.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Optometry Law.

History.

(§ 35-3-150 ACLA 1949)